Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0483.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2220. (1) The palliative care advisory task force is created in the department. (2) Not later than January 1, 2027, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the members of the palliative care advisory task force. Subject to subsection (3), the palliative care advisory task force must consist of the following members: (a) An individual representing a statewide organization representing hospices and home care agencies. (b) Five individuals who are palliative care clinical experts, including, but not limited to, physicians, registered nurses, and nurse practitioners. One individual who is appointed under this subdivision must also represent a rural area of this state. (c) Four individuals, each of whom is selected from a list of 3 or more nominees submitted by each of the following: the senate majority leader, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. Each list submitted under this subdivision must contain individuals who represent leaders or administrators in providing palliative care, represent patients receiving palliative care or family members of patients receiving palliative care, or who are subject matter experts in palliative care. (d) An individual who represents a statewide organization that represents health insurance companies. (e) An individual who represents the Children's Palliative Care Coalition of Michigan. (f) An individual who represents the Michigan Health and Hospital Association. (g) An individual who represents a nonprofit health care corporation operating pursuant to the nonprofit health care corporation reform act, 1980 PA 350, MCL 550.1101 to 550.1704, or a nonprofit mutual disability insurer into which a nonprofit health care corporation has merged as provided in section 5805(1) of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.5805. (3) A person other than an individual must not be represented by more than 1 member on the taskforce at 1 time. (4) The term of a member of the palliative care advisory task force is 4 years. If a vacancy occurs on the palliative care advisory task force, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) The governor may remove a member of the palliative care advisory task force for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (6) A member shall call the first meeting of the palliative care advisory task force. At the first meeting, the palliative care advisory task force shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The palliative care advisory task force shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 3 or more members. (7) A majority of the members of the palliative care advisory task force constitutes a quorum for transacting business. A quorum of the members of the palliative care advisory task force serving is required for any action of the palliative care advisory task force. (8) The palliative care advisory task force shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and in accordance with any other applicable law of this state. (9) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the palliative care advisory task force in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) A member of the palliative care advisory task force is not entitled to compensation for service on the palliative care advisory task force but the department may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (11) The palliative care advisory task force shall do all of the following: (a) Provide the legislature with a recommended definition for palliative care within this state. (b) Conduct research on palliative care. (c) Make recommendations that will expand the provision of palliative care. (d) Identify palliative care services that are offered and measures for reimbursement of the services. (e) Develop key program metrics for palliative care services and make recommendations to the department and the legislature. (f) Collaborate with individuals who can improve and expand high-quality palliative care services. (g) Develop engagement strategies to educate the public on access to palliative care and to improve an individual's ability to make informed decisions on preferred care. (h) Identify the capacity of palliative care providers to provide palliative care services. (12) Not later than January 1, 2028, and every year thereafter, the palliative care task force shall create and make publicly available a report that identifies the palliative care services available in this state and any palliative care services that are not offered in this state but would provide a benefit.